North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 17B. Informing Jury of Possible Punishment upon Conviction.

§ 15-176.9.
Loss of motor vehicle driver’s license.

When a case will be submitted to a jury on a charge for which the penalty involves the possibility of the loss of a motor vehicle driver’s license, either party in its argument to the jury may indicate the consequences of a verdict of guilty of that charge.

History.

1973, c. 1286, s. 25.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1976 case law on criminal procedure, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 989 (1977).